arapahoverbs.lexc
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nou'usixoh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nou'usixoh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@3oxoniw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^3oxoniw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceenih'ohu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceenih'ohu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiito'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiito'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teco'onouu3ine@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teco'onouu3ine^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tebi3ooh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tebi3ooh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niisoohoo3ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niisoohoo3ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ni'ootowootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ni'ootowootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowuh'ohukoohu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowuh'ohukoohu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@xoo'oetiih@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^xoo'oetiih^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@xoo'oetii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^xoo'oetii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bebii3en@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bebii3en^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bebii3en@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bebii3en^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wo'ten@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wo'ten^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bebii3oobe'iyootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bebii3oobe'iyootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wo'ten@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wo'ten^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceibihcehi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceibihcehi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceibihcehiinoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceibihcehiinoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceibeso'on@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceibeso'on^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceibisee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceibisee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hi3oowuukoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hi3oowuukoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hi3oowu3ecoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hi3oowu3ecoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hi3oowu3ecoot@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hi3oowu3ecoot^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teco'onisoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teco'onisoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ni'oteeh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ni'oteeh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'eisise@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'eisise^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wooni'i'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wooni'i'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@boh'o'oo3ootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^boh'o'oo3ootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@boh'o'oo3ee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^boh'o'oo3ee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bobooteeneet@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bobooteeneet^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@boh'o'oo3@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^boh'o'oo3^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bobooteenow@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bobooteenow^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bobooteenee3ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bobooteenee3ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nih'oo3ousih'i@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nih'oo3ousih'i^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@co'cooneniishi'i@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^co'cooneniishi'i^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@biito'obee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^biito'obee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@biito@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^biito^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiitoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiitoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceetoxoh'@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceetoxoh'^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceetoxoh'@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceetoxoh'^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiixowoot@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiixowoot^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@co'onouu3ine@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^co'onouu3ine^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ciino'onouuhu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ciino'onouuhu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@toteen@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^toteen^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@heesiniw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^heesiniw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowkuu3ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowkuu3ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowkuu3@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowkuu3^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowciiyei'i@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowciiyei'i^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@yei'i@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^yei'i^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowkuutii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowkuutii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@neehiiw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^neehiiw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@to'unoo'oo3ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^to'unoo'oo3ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hi3okounoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hi3okounoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesi3oo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesi3oo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesibei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesibei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceseceini'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceseceini'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceseibih@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceseibih^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cese'in@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cese'in^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiiseineeb@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiiseineeb^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bee3i'i@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bee3i'i^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiisei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiisei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiise'enou'utii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiise'enou'utii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiise'enou'uh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiise'enou'uh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiisi'i'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiisi'i'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiteto'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiteto'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hitetooku'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hitetooku'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceeh'e3towoo3@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceeh'e3towoo3^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceeeteese@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceeeteese^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceeetiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceeetiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@heto'oh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^heto'oh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3okusee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3okusee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
